North Carolina statutes. Constitution of North Carolina
Article II Legislative

§ 1. Legislative power.

The legislative power of the State shall be vested in the General Assembly, which shall consist of a Senate and a House of Representatives.

History.

1969, c. 1258, s. 1.

History Note.

The provisions of this section are similar to those of Art. II, § 1, Const. 1868.

Legal Periodicals.

For note on delegation of legislative authority to individuals, see 31 N.C.L. Rev. 308 (1953).

For case law survey as to separation of powers, see 44 N.C.L. Rev. 947 (1966).

For survey of 1979 constitutional law, see 58 N.C.L. Rev. 1326 (1980).

For comment on sectarian education and the State, see 1980 Duke L.J. 801.

For survey of 1982 law relating to constitutional law, see 61 N.C.L. Rev. 1052 (1983).

For article, “Defining Lawmaking Power,” see 51 Wake Forest L. Rev. 881 (2016).

For article, “Deregulation Using Stealth “Science” Strategies,” see 68 Duke L.J. 1719 (2019).

For article, “From Aristocracy to Democracy: The Legislative Ascent to General Statute in the Moral Science of the Law in North Carolina [PSI],” see 42 Campbell L. Rev. 215 (2020).

§ 2. Number of Senators.

The Senate shall be composed of 50 Senators, biennially chosen by ballot.

History.

1969, c. 1258, s. 1.

History Note.

The provisions of this section are similar to those of Art. II, § 3, Const. 1868.

Defeated Amendment Proposals.

An amendment proposed by Session Laws 1981, c. 504, s. 1, and defeated at the election held June 29, 1982, would have provided that Senators be chosen quadrennially.

An amendment proposed by Session Laws 1985, c. 768, s. 11, and defeated at the primary election held on May 6, 1986, would have added “Except that there shall be no election in 1988, and elections shall be conducted in 1989 and biennially thereafter” at the end of the section.

§ 3. Senate districts; apportionment of Senators.

The Senators shall be elected from districts. The General Assembly, at the first regular session convening after the return of every decennial census of population taken by order of Congress, shall revise the senate districts and the apportionment of Senators among those districts, subject to the following requirements:

Each Senator shall represent, as nearly as may be, an equal number of inhabitants, the number of inhabitants that each Senator represents being determined for this purpose by dividing the population of the district that he represents by the number of Senators apportioned to that district;

Each senate district shall at all times consist of contiguous territory;

No county shall be divided in the formation of a senate district;

When established, the senate districts and the apportionment of Senators shall remain unaltered until the return of another decennial census of population taken by order of Congress.

History.

1969, c. 1258, s. 1.

Cross references.

As to apportionment of the Senate, see

G.S. 120-1

.

History Note.

The provisions of this section are similar to those of Art. II, § 4, Const. 1868, as amended in 1872-1873 and in 1968.

§ 4. Number of Representatives.

The House of Representatives shall be composed of 120 Representatives, biennially chosen by ballot.

History.

1969, c. 1258, s. 1.

History Note.

The provisions of this section are similar to those of Art. II, § 5, Const. 1868, as amended in 1872-1873, 1962 and 1968.

Defeated Amendment Proposals.

An amendment proposed by Session Laws 1981, c. 504, s. 1, and defeated at the election held June 29, 1982, would have provided that Representatives be chosen quadrennially.

An amendment proposed by Session Laws 1985, c. 768, s. 11, and defeated at the primary election held on May 6, 1986, would have added “Except that there shall be no election in 1988, and elections shall be conducted in 1989 and biennially thereafter” at the end of the section.

§ 5. Representative districts; apportionment of Representatives.

The Representatives shall be elected from districts. The General Assembly, at the first regular session convening after the return of every decennial census of population taken by order of Congress, shall revise the representative districts and the apportionment of Representatives among those districts, subject to the following requirements:

Each Representative shall represent, as nearly as may be, an equal number of inhabitants, the number of inhabitants that each Representative represents being determined for this purpose by dividing the population of the district that he represents by the number of Representatives apportioned to that district;

Each representative district shall at all times consist of contiguous territory;

No county shall be divided in the formation of a representative district;

When established, the representative districts and the apportionment of Representatives shall remain unaltered until the return of another decennial census of population taken by order of Congress.

History.

1969, c. 1258, s. 1.

Cross references.

As to House apportionment, see

G.S. 120-2

.

§ 6. Qualifications for Senator.

Each Senator, at the time of his election, shall be not less than 25 years of age, shall be a qualified voter of the State, and shall have resided in the State as a citizen for two years and in the district for which he is chosen for one year immediately preceding his election.

History.

1969, c. 1258, s. 1.

History Note.

The provisions of this section are similar to those of Art. II, § 7, Const. 1868.

§ 7. Qualifications for Representative.

Each Representative, at the time of his election, shall be a qualified voter of the State, and shall have resided in the district for which he is chosen for one year immediately preceding his election.

History.

1969, c. 1258, s. 1.

History Note.

The provisions of this section are similar to those of Art. II, § 8, Const. 1868, as amended in 1968.

OPINIONS OF ATTORNEY GENERAL

A person must be 21 years old by the date of the general election in order to be elected to the House of Representatives.

See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. William R. Gilkeson, Jr., Staff Attorney, Research Division, Legislative Services Office, North Carolina General Assembly, 1999 N.C. AG LEXIS 33 (11/3/99).

§ 8. Elections.

The election for members of the General Assembly shall be held for the respective districts in 1972 and every two years thereafter, at the places and on the day prescribed by law.

History.

1969, c. 1258, s. 1.

History Note.

The provisions of this section are similar to those of Art. II, § 27, Const. 1868, as amended by the Convention of 1875 and in 1968.

Defeated Amendment Proposals.

An amendment proposed by Session Laws 1981, c. 504, s. 1, and defeated at the election held June 29, 1982, would have provided that elections be held every four years.

An amendment proposed by Session Laws 1985, c. 768, s. 1, and defeated at the primary election held on May 6, 1986, would have amended this section by deleting “1972 and every two years thereafter” and substituting “1986, and in 1989 and every two years thereafter.”

§ 9. Term of office.

The term of office of Senators and Representatives shall commence on the first day of January next after their election.

History.

1969, c. 1258, s. 1; 1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1241, s. 1.

History Note.

The provisions of this section are similar to those of Art. II, § 25, Const. 1868, as amended by the Convention of 1875.

§ 10. Vacancies.

Every vacancy occurring in the membership of the General Assembly by reason of death, resignation, or other cause shall be filled in the manner prescribed by law.

History.

1969, c. 1258, s. 1.

History Note.

The provisions of this section are similar to those of Art. II, § 13, Const. 1868, as amended in 1952 and 1968.

§ 11. Sessions.

Regular sessions.— The General Assembly shall meet in regular session in 1973 and every two years thereafter on the day prescribed by law. Neither house shall proceed upon public business unless a majority of all of its members are actually present.

Extra sessions on legislative call.— The President of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall convene the General Assembly in extra session by their joint proclamation upon receipt by the President of the Senate of written requests therefor signed by three-fifths of all the members of the Senate and upon receipt by the Speaker of the House of Representatives of written requests therefor signed by three-fifths of all the members of the House of Representatives.

History.

1969, c. 1270, s. 1.

Cross references.

As to the convening of the regular session of the Senate and House of Representatives, see

G.S. 120-11.1

.

History Note.

The provisions of subsection (1) of this section are similar to those of Art. II, § 2, Const. 1868, as amended in 1872-1873, by the Convention of 1875 and in 1956.

Defeated Amendment Proposals.

An amendment proposed by Session Laws 1985, c. 768, s. 12, and defeated at the primary election held on May 6, 1986, would have amended this section by substituting “1987, and in 1990 and every two years thereafter” for “1973 and every two years thereafter” in subsection (1).

§ 12. Oath of members.

Each member of the General Assembly, before taking his seat, shall take an oath or affirmation that he will support the Constitution and laws of the United States and the Constitution of the State of North Carolina, and will faithfully discharge his duty as a member of the Senate or House of Representatives.

History.

1969, c. 1258, s. 1.

History Note.

The provisions of this section are similar to those of Art. II, § 24, Const. 1868.

§ 13. President of the Senate.

The Lieutenant Governor shall be President of the Senate and shall preside over the Senate, but shall have no vote unless the Senate is equally divided.

History.

1969, c. 1258, s. 1.

History Note.

The provisions of this section are similar to those of Art. II, § 19, Const. 1868.

§ 14. Other officers of the Senate.

President Pro Tempore — succession to presidency.— The Senate shall elect from its membership a President Pro Tempore, who shall become President of the Senate upon the failure of the Lieutenant Governor-elect to qualify, or upon succession by the Lieutenant Governor to the office of Governor, or upon the death, resignation, or removal from office of the President of the Senate, and who shall serve until the expiration of his term of office as Senator.

President Pro Tempore — temporary succession.— During the physical or mental incapacity of the President of the Senate to perform the duties of his office, or during the absence of the President of the Senate, the President Pro Tempore shall preside over the Senate.

Other officers.— The Senate shall elect its other officers.

History.

1969, c. 1258, s. 1.

History Note.

The provisions of this section are similar to those of Art. II, § 20, Const. 1868, as amended in 1962.

§ 15. Officers of the House of Representatives.

The House of Representatives shall elect its Speaker and other officers.

History.

1969, c. 1258, s. 1.

History Note.

The provisions of this section are similar to those of Art. II, § 18, Const. 1868.

§ 16. Compensation and allowances.

The members and officers of the General Assembly shall receive for their services the compensation and allowances prescribed by law. An increase in the compensation or allowances of members shall become effective at the beginning of the next regular session of the General Assembly following the session at which it was enacted.

History.

1969, c. 1258, s. 1.

History Note.

The provisions of this section are similar to those of Art. II, § 28, Const. 1868, as added by the Convention of 1875 and amended in 1928, 1950, 1956 and 1968.

§ 17. Journals.

Each house shall keep a journal of its proceedings, which shall be printed and made public immediately after the adjournment of the General Assembly.

History.

1969, c. 1258, s. 1.

History Note.

The provisions of this section are similar to those of Art. II, § 16, Const. 1868.

§ 18. Protests.

Any member of either house may dissent from and protest against any act or resolve which he may think injurious to the public or to any individual, and have the reasons of his dissent entered on the journal.

History.

1969, c. 1258, s. 1.

History Note.

The provisions of this section are similar to those of Art. II, § 17, Const. 1868.

§ 19. Record votes.

Upon motion made in either house and seconded by one fifth of the members present, the yeas and nays upon any question shall be taken and entered upon the journal.

History.

1969, c. 1258, s. 1.

History Note.

The provisions of this section are similar to those of Art. II, § 26, Const. 1868.

§ 20. Powers of the General Assembly.

Each house shall be judge of the qualifications and elections of its own members, shall sit upon its own adjournment from day to day, and shall prepare bills to be enacted into laws. The two houses may jointly adjourn to any future day or other place. Either house may, of its own motion, adjourn for a period not in excess of three days.

History.

1969, c. 1258, s. 1.

History Note.

The provisions of the first two sentences of this section are similar to those of Art. II, § 24, Const. 1868.

Defeated Amendment Proposals.

Session Laws 2018-117, s. 3, proposed an amendment to Sec. 20 of Article II of the North Carolina Constitution, which would have added the following provisions:
“No law shall be enacted by the General Assembly that appoints a member of the General Assembly to any board or commission that exercises executive or judicial powers.” The constitutional amendment was submitted to the voters at the general election held November 6, 2018, and was defeated.

§ 21. Style of the acts.

The style of the acts shall be: “The General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:”.

History.

1969, c. 1258, s. 1.

History Note.

The provisions of this section are similar to those of Art. II, § 21, Const. 1868.

§ 22. Action on bills.

Bills subject to veto by Governor; override of veto.— Except as provided by subsections (2) through (6) of this section, all bills shall be read three times in each house and shall be signed by the presiding officer of each house before being presented to the Governor. If the Governor approves, the Governor shall sign it and it shall become a law; but if not, the Governor shall return it with objections, together with a veto message stating the reasons for such objections, to that house in which it shall have originated, which shall enter the objections and veto message at large on its journal, and proceed to reconsider it. If after such reconsideration three-fifths of the members of that house present and voting shall agree to pass the bill, it shall be sent, together with the objections and veto message, to the other house, by which it shall likewise be reconsidered; and if approved by three-fifths of the members of that house present and voting, it shall become a law notwithstanding the objections of the Governor. In all such cases the votes of both houses shall be determined by yeas and nays, and the names of the members voting shall be entered on the journal of each house respectively.

Amendments to Constitution of North Carolina.— Every bill proposing a new or revised Constitution or an amendment or amendments to this Constitution or calling a convention of the people of this State, and containing no other matter, shall be submitted to the qualified voters of this State after it shall have been read three times in each house and signed by the presiding officers of both houses.

Amendments to Constitution of the United States.— Every bill approving an amendment to the Constitution of the United States, or applying for a convention to propose amendments to the Constitution of the United States, and containing no other matter, shall be read three times in each house before it becomes law, and shall be signed by the presiding officers of both houses.

Joint resolutions.— Every joint resolution shall be read three times in each house before it becomes effective and shall be signed by the presiding officers of both houses.

Other exceptions.— Every bill:

In which the General Assembly makes an appointment or appointments to public office and which contains no other matter;

Revising the senate districts and the apportionment of Senators among those districts and containing no other matter;

Revising the representative districts and the apportionment of Representatives among those districts and containing no other matter; or

Revising the districts for the election of members of the House of Representatives of the Congress of the United States and the apportionment of Representatives among those districts and containing no other matter,

shall be read three times in each house before it becomes law and shall be signed by the presiding officers of both houses.

(6)

Local bills.—

Every bill that applies in fewer than 15 counties shall be read three times in each house before it becomes law and shall be signed by the presiding officers of both houses. The exemption from veto by the Governor provided in this subsection does not apply if the bill, at the time it is signed by the presiding officers:

(a)

Would extend the application of a law signed by the presiding officers during that two year term of the General Assembly so that the law would apply in more than half the counties in the State, or

(b)

Would enact a law identical in effect to another law or laws signed by the presiding officers during that two year term of the General Assembly that the result of those laws taken together would be a law applying in more than half the counties in the State.Notwithstanding any other language in this subsection, the exemption from veto provided by this subsection does not apply to any bill to enact a general law classified by population or other criteria, or to any bill that contains an appropriation from the State treasury.

(7)

Time for action by Governor; reconvening of session.—

If any bill shall not be returned by the Governor within 10 days after it shall have been presented to him, the same shall be a law in like manner as if he had signed it, unless the General Assembly shall have adjourned:

(a)

For more than 30 days jointly as provided under Section 20 of Article II of this Constitution; or

(b)

Sine die

in which case it shall become a law unless, within 30 days after such adjournment, it is returned by the Governor with objections and veto message to that house in which it shall have originated. When the General Assembly has adjourned sine die or for more than 30 days jointly as provided under Section 20 of Article II of this Constitution, the Governor shall reconvene that session as provided by Section 5(11) of Article III of this Constitution for reconsideration of the bill, and if the Governor does not reconvene the session, the bill shall become law on the fortieth day after such adjournment. Notwithstanding the previous sentence, if the Governor prior to reconvening the session receives written requests dated no earlier than 30 days after such adjournment, signed by a majority of the members of each house that a reconvened session to reconsider vetoed legislation is unnecessary, the Governor shall not reconvene the session for that purpose and any legislation vetoed in accordance with this section after adjournment shall not become law.

(8)

Return of bills after adjournment.—

For purposes of return of bills not approved by the Governor, each house shall designate an officer to receive returned bills during its adjournment.

History.

1969, c. 1258, s. 1; 1995, c. 5, s. 1.

History Note.

The provisions of this section are similar to those of Art. II, § 23, Const. 1868.

Defeated Amendment Proposals.

Session Laws 2018-132, 2nd Ex. Sess., s. 5, proposed an amendment to Sec. 22 of Article II of the North Carolina Constitution, which would have added new subdivisions (5)(e) and (f), providing for nonpartisan judicial merit commissions for the nomination and recommendation of nominees when filling vacancies occurring in the offices of Justice or Judge of the General Court of Justice. The constitutional amendment was submitted to the voters at the general election held November 6, 2018, and was defeated.

§ 23. Revenue bills.

No law shall be enacted to raise money on the credit of the State, or to pledge the faith of the State directly or indirectly for the payment of any debt, or to impose any tax upon the people of the State, or to allow the counties, cities, or towns to do so, unless the bill for the purpose shall have been read three several times in each house of the General Assembly and passed three several readings, which readings shall have been on three different days, and shall have been agreed to by each house respectively, and unless the yeas and nays on the second and third readings of the bill shall have been entered on the journal.

History.

1969, c. 1258, s. 1.

History Note.

The provisions of this section are similar to those of Art. II, § 14, Const. 1868.

§ 24. Limitations on local, private, and special legislation.

Prohibited subjects.— The General Assembly shall not enact any local, private, or special act or resolution:

Relating to health, sanitation, and the abatement of nuisances;

Changing the names of cities, towns, and townships;

Authorizing the laying out, opening, altering, maintaining, or discontinuing of highways, streets, or alleys;

Relating to ferries or bridges;

Relating to non-navigable streams;

Relating to cemeteries;

Relating to the pay of jurors;

Erecting new townships, or changing township lines, or establishing or changing the lines of school districts;

Remitting fines, penalties, and forfeitures, or refunding moneys legally paid into the public treasury;

Regulating labor, trade, mining, or manufacturing;

Extending the time for the levy or collection of taxes or otherwise relieving any collector of taxes from the due performance of his official duties or his sureties from liability;

Giving effect to informal wills and deeds;

Granting a divorce or securing alimony in any individual case;

Altering the name of any person, or legitimating any person not born in lawful wedlock, or restoring to the rights of citizenship any person convicted of a felony.

(2)

Repeals.—

Nor shall the General Assembly enact any such local, private, or special act by the partial repeal of a general law; but the General Assembly may at any time repeal local, private, or special laws enacted by it.

(3)

Prohibited acts void.—

Any local, private, or special act or resolution enacted in violation of the provisions of this Section shall be void.

(4)

General laws.—

The General Assembly may enact general laws regulating the matters set out in this Section.

History.

1969, c. 1258, s. 1.

Cross references.

As to the organization and modification of school districts, see

G.S. 115C-65

et seq.

History Note.

The provisions of this section, with the exception of subdivisions (m) and (n) of subsection (1), are similar to those of Art. II, § 29, Const. 1868, as added in 1916 and amended in 1962. The provisions of subdivision (m) of subsection (1) are similar to those of Art. II, § 10, Const. 1868, and the provisions of subdivision (n) of subsection (1) are similar to those of Art. II, § 11, Const. 1868.

Legal Periodicals.

For note on constitutionality of local laws, see 36 N.C.L. Rev. 537 (1958).

For article discussing the history and present vitality of this section, see 45 N.C.L. Rev. 340 (1967).

For article on antitrust and unfair trade practice law in North Carolina, with federal law compared, see 50 N.C.L. Rev. 199 (1972).

For survey of 1978 constitutional law, see 57 N.C.L. Rev. 958 (1979).

For article, “A History of Liquor-By-The-Drink Legislation in North Carolina,” see 1 Campbell L. Rev. 61 (1979).

For survey of 1979 administrative law, see 58 N.C.L. Rev. 1185 (1980).

As to comment discussing beach access legislation as unconstitutional local legislation, see 64 N.C.L. Rev. 159 (1985).

For article, “The Battle to Preserve North Carolina’s Estuarine Marshes: The 1985 Legislation, Private Claims to Estuarine Marshes, Denial of Permits to Fill, and the Public Trust,” see 64 N.C.L. Rev. 565 (1986).

For note, “Town of Emerald Isle v. State of North Carolina: A New Test for Distinguishing Between General Laws and Local Legislation,” see 66 N.C.L. Rev. 1096 (1988).

For comment, “Legal Analysis of the Constitutionality of the Water Supply Watershed Protection Act of 1989 and the Hyde Bill,” see 29 Wake Forest L. Rev. 1279 (1994).

For article, “Do North Carolina Governments Need Home Rule,” see 84 N.C. L. Rev. 1983 (2006).

For article, “Searching Everywhere for a Section 24(1)(A) Standard:
City of Asheville, Town of Boone, and the Unclear Future of Local-State Relations in North Carolina,” see 96 N.C.L. Rev. 1882 (2018).